Utah statutes.
67-5-28.   Memorandum of Understanding regarding enforcement of federal immigration laws -- Communications regarding immigration status -- Private cause of action.

(1)  The attorney general shall negotiate the terms of a Memorandum of Understanding between the state and the United States Department of Justice or the United States Department of Homeland Security as provided in 8 U.S.C., Sec. 1357(g) for the enforcement of federal immigration and customs laws within the state by state and local law enforcement personnel, to include investigations, apprehensions, detentions, and removals of persons who are illegally present in the United States.

(2)  The attorney general, the governor, or an individual otherwise required by the appropriate federal agency referred to in Subsection (1) shall sign the Memorandum of Understanding on behalf of the state.

(3) (a)  A unit of local government, whether acting through its governing body or by an initiative or referendum, may not enact an ordinance or policy that limits or prohibits a law enforcement officer, local official, or local government employee from communicating or cooperating with federal officials regarding the immigration status of a person within the state.

(b)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a government entity or official within the state may not prohibit or in any way restrict a government entity or official from sending to, or receiving from, the United States Department of Homeland Security information regarding the citizenship or immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of an individual.

(c)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person or agency may not prohibit or in any way restrict a public employee from doing the following regarding the immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of an individual:

(i)  sending information to or requesting or receiving information from the United States Department of Homeland Security;

(ii)  maintaining the information referred to in Subsection (3)(c)(i); and

(iii)  exchanging the information referred to in Subsection (3)(c)(i) with any other federal, state, or local government entity.

(d)  This Subsection (3) allows for a private right of action by a natural or legal person lawfully domiciled in this state to file for a writ of mandamus to compel a noncompliant local or state governmental agency to comply with the reporting laws of this Subsection (3).



Enacted by Chapter 26, 2008 General Session

